Maryland, session 2026, SB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1010.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) In order to provide the public with access to the use, enjoyment, and
appreciation of the outdoor areas of Maryland, it is declared to be the public policy of this
State to provide the means and procedures for establishing and expanding a network of
recreational and scenic trails;
(2) Abandoned railroad corridor property is a unique source of land
corridors that are, in many cases, suitable for recreational trails;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1001*

SENATE BILL 1001
(3) Railroad corridor property is being abandoned at a high rate and is
often sold in segments, thereby fragmenting the original corridors and leaving unconnected
segments which may be suitable for acquisition for recreational trail use;
(4) The preservation of abandoned rail corridor property for use as
recreational trails is in the public interest; and
(5) A systematic and continuing statewide program of acquiring abandoned
railroad corridor property is needed to preserve this unique and irreplaceable source of
recreational trails.
(b) (1) The Department shall maintain liaison with, provide factual data to,
and work with the Department of Transportation, the State Railroad Administration, the
Department of Planning, other agencies, and local governments to determine the suitability
for trail purposes of railroad corridor property proposed for abandonment.
(2) The Department may conduct feasibility studies and appraisals of
railroad corridor property proposed for abandonment.
(3) The Department may acquire railroad corridors pursuant to the
National Trails Systems Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1241 et seq., as amended.
(c) (1) If, under the provisions of § 7–901 of the Transportation Article, the
Department of Transportation acquires railroad corridor property considered suitable for
use as recreational trails, the Department may request interim use of the property for
public recreational use.
(2) The Department may lease a corridor from the Department of
Transportation and sublease it to a local government subject to all the terms and conditions
of the original lease.
(3) Any lease of railroad corridor property by the Department for interim
use for public recreation shall be subject to restoration or reconstruction for railroad
purposes, and the interim use may not be considered as an abandonment of the use of the
railroad corridor for railroad purposes.
(4) (I) Prior to undertaking the development of a railroad corridor
property for recreational use the Department shall conduct a public hearing in the affected
county.
(II) The hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general
circulation in the affected county for 3 consecutive weeks.
(D) PRIOR TO UNDERTAKING THE DEVELOPMENT OF A RAILROAD
CORRIDOR PROPERTY FOR RECREATIONAL USE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL

SENATE BILL 1001 3
ESTABLISH THROUGH A TITLE SEARCH THAT THE STATE OWNS THE PROPERTY IN
FEE SIMPLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.